Louisiana, session 2026, SB104.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
portion of Louisiana Highway 1, beginning where Louisiana Highway 1 intersects with
Louisiana Highway 78, and ending at the Pointe Coupee Parish line before crossing
into Avoyelles Parish, is hereby designated as the "Ernest J. Gaines Memorial
Highway".
Section 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
portion of Louisiana Highway 16, between Louisiana Highway 1033 and Louisiana
Highway 1026 in the city of Denham Springs, Livingston Parish, is hereby designated
as the "Deputy Katherine "Ms. Katy" Wells Memorial Highway".
Section 3. The Department of Transportation and Development is hereby
directed to erect and maintain appropriate signs of these designations provided local
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 104 ENROLLED
or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual
costs for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of each sign, not to
exceed the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.